src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON DemPron2	!(uv)
+Gram/Dem+Pron+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnaa	IV_voq ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkuu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCna	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCuma	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg+Err/Sub:%>%TRUNCumap	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCkua	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCuminnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCkuninnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCumunnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCkununnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCumunngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+R+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkununngar	IV_r ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCumunngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+UTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkununngaap	XTuteXmorf ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCumani	LokVb ; !PL 20170403 slettet udkommentering
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCkunani	LokVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCumannga	Krestr ; !PL 20170403 slettet udkommentering
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCumanngaanniit	Krestr ; !PL 20180913 med pleonasme
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCkunannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCumuuna	ViaVb ; !PL 20170403 slettet udkommentering
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCkunuunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCkunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCkunuuna	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCkunuunatigut	ViaVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnatut	AeqVb ; !PL tilføjet SUB 20170403
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCumatut	AeqVb ; !PL 20170403
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCkunatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>%TRUNCumaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:%>%TRUNCumaak	# ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+AA:%>%TRUNCumaangaa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+AA:%>%TRUNCumaak-aa	# ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+KASIK:%>%TRUNCumaakasik # ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+KASIK+AA:%>%TRUNCumaakasingaa # ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+PALAAQ:%>%TRUNCumaapalaaq # ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+PALAAQ+KASIK+AA:%>%TRUNCumaapalaakasingaa # ; 
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl:%>%TRUNCkorsii	# ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Pl+AA:%>%TRUNCkorsiiaa	# ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaakasik	Krestr ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+AA:uumaakasingaa Krestr ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaakasiik	Krestr ;
+KULUK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnakkuluk	Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnannguaq Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaannguaq	Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaannguaaq	Krestr ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg+AA:uumaapalaakasingaa Krestr ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnarpiaq Krestr ;
+RALAK+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnaralakasik	Krestr ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumarujuk	Krestr ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumarujuuk	Krestr ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaarujuk	Krestr ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaarujuuk	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaarsuaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Der/Vok+Sg:uumaarsuaaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnarsuaq	Krestr ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnartaa	Krestr ; !unartaa


LEXICON DemPron3	!(Speciel 'TA+manna:taman')
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCtuma	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCtuminnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumunnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumani	LokVb ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumanerpiaq	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumannga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumuuna	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumuunakkut	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtumasut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCkkorpassuarnut	Krestr ; !står den rigtigt?

LEXICON DemPron4	!(AA+rod)
+RALAK+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>naralakasik	Krestr ;
+RALAK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>naralak	Krestr ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>nakasik	Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>nannguaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>narsuaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>korsuit	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>na	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>gga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;

LEXICON DemPron5	!(AA+rod)
+RALAK+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnngaralakasik	Krestr ;
+RALAK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnngaralak	Krestr ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnngakasik	Krestr ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnngannguaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnngarsuaq	Krestr ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>korsuit	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCnnga	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Sg+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCnngaarakasik	Krestr ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>ku	K_plur ;
+Gram/Dem+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kua	K_plur ;

LEXICON IntPron1	!(kina:ki)
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kkorpassuit	K_plur ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>narsuaq	Krestr ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>narpiaq	Krestr ;
!+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg+U+Der/nv:%>narpiaa	IV_voq ; !kinarpiaanera
!+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg+U+Der/nv:%>naa	IV_voq ;
!+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg+U+Der/nv+Orth/Alt:%>u	IV_voq ; !kiuit? og ikke kinaavit?
!+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Pl+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>kkuu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+Gram/Int+U+Der/nv:%>narpiaa	IV_voq ; !!PL20230720 rettet denne og tre følgende
+Gram/Int+U+Der/nv:%>naa	IV_voq ; 
+Gram/Int+U+Der/nv+Orth/Alt:%>u	IV_voq ; !kiuit? og ikke kinaavit?
+Gram/Int+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>kkuu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg:%>na	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Sg+Orth/Arch:%>su	Krestr ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abs+Pl:%>kkut	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Rel+Sg:%>a	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>ap	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Rel+Pl:%>kkut	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Ins+Sg:%>mik	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Ins+Pl:%>kkunnik	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Trm+Sg:%>mut	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>kkunnut	TrmVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Trm+Pl:%>kkunnut	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Lok+Sg:%>mi	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>kkunni	LokVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Lok+Pl:%>kkunni	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abl+Sg:%>mit	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>kkunnit	AblVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Abl+Pl:%>kkunnit	K_TUQ_plur ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Via+Sg:%>kkut	ViaVb ;	!kikkut? imalt. kinakkut?
+Gram/Int+Pron+Via+Sg:%>kkut	K_TUQ ;	!kikkut? imalt. kinakkut?
+Gram/Int+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kkunatigut	ViaVb ;	!kikkunatigut? imalt. kikkutigut?
+Gram/Int+Pron+Via+Pl:%>kkunatigut	K_TUQ_plur ;	!kikkunatigut? imalt. kikkutigut?
+Gram/Int+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>natut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Aeq+Sg:%>natut	K_TUQ ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kkunatut	AeqVb ;
+Gram/Int+Pron+Aeq+Pl:%>kkunatut	K_TUQ_plur ;

LEXICON DemPron	!(demonstrative pronominer)
manna:man	DemPron3 ;	!Speciel (matuma)
una:uv	DemPron2 ;
TA+manna:taman	DemPron3 ;	!Speciel (tamatuma)
AA+anna:aajav	DemPron4 ;
AA+pav:aapav	DemPron4 ;	
AA+qanna:aaqav	DemPron4 ;
AA+inna:aajiv	DemPron4 ;
AA+kanna:aakan	DemPron4 ;
AA+qanna:aaqam	DemPron4 ;
AA+sanna:aasam	DemPron4 ;
AA+pinnga:aapik	DemPron5 ;
AA+innga:aajik	DemPron5 ;
AA+kinnga:aakig	DemPron5 ;
AA+manna:aaman	DemPron4 ;
AA+una:aaju	DemPron4 ;
AA+una:aa	DemPron4 ;
